Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-911
Joint power plant; bonds; election; interest.

Cities of the second class or villages contemplating the erection of a joint power plant, electric or other light works under section 17-910 may vote joint bonds in an amount not in excess of seven percent of the valuation of such cities or villages for the purpose of defraying the cost of such power plant, electric or other light works. The question of issuing such joint bonds for the purpose contemplated shall be submitted to the electors of the respective cities or villages interested at an election held for that purpose in each of such cities or villages after notice of such election for not less than twenty days shall have been given by publication in the manner provided in section 17-908. Such bonds may be issued only when a majority of the electors in each of the cities or villages interested and voting on the question favor their issuance. If in any one of such cities or villages voting on such question a majority of the electors voting in such city or village shall fail to favor the issuance of such joint bonds then the entire election in all of the cities or villages voting shall be deemed void and of no effect. Such joint bonds shall bear interest payable annually or semiannually and shall be payable any time the cities or villages may determine at the time of their issuance, but in not more than twenty years after their issuance, with the option of paying any or all of such bonds at any time after five years from their date.

Laws 1921, c. 192, § 2, p. 713;

C.S.1922, § 4395;

C.S.1929, § 17-602;

R.S.1943, § 17-911;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 51, p. 304;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 16;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 247.
August 24, 2017